Utah statutes.
77-20b-102.   Time for bringing defendant to court.

(1)  If notice of nonappearance has been mailed to a surety under Section 77-20b-101, the surety may bring the defendant before the court or surrender the defendant into the custody of a county sheriff within the state within six months of the date of nonappearance, during which time a forfeiture action on the bond may not be brought.

(2)  A surety may request an extension of the six-month time period in Subsection (1), if the surety within that time:

(a)  files a motion for extension with the court; and

(b)  mails the motion for extension and a notice of hearing on the motion to the prosecutor.

(3)  The court may extend the six-month time in Subsection (1) for not more than 60 days, if the surety has complied with Subsection (2) and the court finds good cause.



Amended by Chapter 259, 2000 General Session

